Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB434.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1704 of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is repealed:[§ 1704. Marriage between persons of the same sex.It is hereby declared to be the strong and longstanding public policy of this Commonwealth that marriage shall be between one man and one woman. A marriage between persons of the same sex which was entered into in another state or foreign jurisdiction, even if valid where entered into, shall be void in this Commonwealth.]Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.12345678910111213141516